Utah statutes.
78B-8-404.   Department authority -- Rules.

The Labor Commission, in consultation with the Department of Health, has authority to establish rules necessary for the purposes of Subsections 78B-8-401(2) and (7).



Amended by Chapter 114, 2013 General Session

